Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Chapter 90. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 06.90.010.
Automated teller machine fee.

Unless a fee is otherwise prohibited by or conflicts with federal law, a person that owns an automated teller machine may charge a fee for the use of the automated teller machine to conduct a transaction accessing an account from an international financial institution. In this section,

“automated teller machine” means an electronic device that dispenses cash in connection with a credit, deposit, or checking account at an international financial institution;

“international financial institution” means a person that is organized and licensed under the laws of a foreign country to engage in a banking business; in this paragraph, “banking business” means a business that offers deposit accounts, makes loans, and conducts other financial transactions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 11 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 2,
ch. 11, SLA 2020 makes this section effective April 21, 2020, in accordance with
AS

01.10.070(c)

.